test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-tueue30_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - tüü: # Noun (30) tüü 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    tüü+N+Sg+Nom: tüü
    tüü+N+Sg+Gen: tüü
    tüü+N+Sg+Par: tüüd
    tüü+N+Sg+Ill: [tüühü, tühüq]
    tüü+N+Sg+Ine: [tüün, tüüh, tüühn]
    tüü+N+Sg+Ela: tüüst
    tüü+N+Sg+All: tüüle
    tüü+N+Sg+Ade: tüül
    tüü+N+Sg+Abl: tüült
    tüü+N+Sg+Tra: tüüs
    tüü+N+Sg+Ter: tüüniq
    tüü+N+Sg+Abe: tüüldäq
    tüü+N+Sg+Com: tüügaq
    tüü+N+Pl+Nom: tüüq
    tüü+N+Pl+Gen: töie
    tüü+N+Pl+Par: töid
    tüü+N+Pl+Ill: [töihte, töihe]
    tüü+N+Pl+Ine: [töin, töih, töihn, töien, töieh, töiehn]
    tüü+N+Pl+Ela: [töist, töiest]
    tüü+N+Pl+All: [töile, töiele]
    tüü+N+Pl+Ade: [töil, töiel]
    tüü+N+Pl+Abl: [töilt, töielt]
    tüü+N+Pl+Tra: [töis, töies]
    tüü+N+Pl+Ter: töieniq
    tüü+N+Pl+Abe: [töildäq, töieldäq]
    tüü+N+Pl+Com: töiegaq
